Utah statutes.
72-5-112.   Acquisition of real property from county, city, or other
political subdivision -- Exchange.
The department may purchase or otherwise acquire from any county, city, or
other political subdivision of the state real property or interests in real
property which may be exchanged for or used in the purchase of other real
property or interests in real property to be used in connection with the
construction, maintenance, or operation of state highways.
